Tennessee, session 114, HB1853.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2308, is amended by deleting
"Allura Red AC, which is Chemical Abstracts Service registry number 25956-17-6 and also
known as Red 40," and substituting "any artificial food dye".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1853
011089
- 1 -